Illinois, session 104th, SB2174.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Veterans Preference in Private Employment 5Act is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (330 ILCS 56/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 9States Army, Marine Corps, Navy, Air Force, and Coast Guard, 10or the reserve component of any of those, and includes the 11Illinois National Guard. 12    "Private employer" means any non-public sole proprietor, 13corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other 14private, non-public entity employing one or more employees 15within Illinois.16    "Veteran" means an individual who meets one or more of the 17following:18        (1) has served on active duty with the armed forces of 19    the United States for a period of more than 180 days and 20    was discharged or released from active duty under 21    conditions other than dishonorable;22        (2) was discharged or released from active duty with 23    the armed forces of the United States because of a   SB2174- 2 -LRB104 08169 KTG 18217 b1    service-connected disability; or 2        (3) is a member of the Illinois National Guard or 3    United States Armed Forces Reserves who has never been 4    deployed but separated under conditions other than 5    dishonorable as noted on the individual's service NGB-22 6    discharge form.7    "Veterans' preference employment policy" means a private 8employer's voluntary preference for hiring, promoting, or 9retaining a veteran over another equally qualified applicant 10or employee.11(Source: P.A. 99-152, eff. 1-1-16.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.